Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1840.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 21, 1937 (P.L.774, No.211), referred to as the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission Act, is amended by adding a section to read:1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 Section 5.4. (a) A disabled veteran is entitled to receive a fifty per centum reduction in the electronic toll rate for the use of the turnpike. To qualify for the reduced toll rate, the disabled veteran must:(1) Be a resident of this Commonwealth.(2) Have a valid electronic transponder issued by the commission.(3) Submit an application, approved by the commission, for the toll reduction.(4) Submit documentation of a disability that:(i) was incurred in a war or armed conflict and consists of the loss of one or more limbs, the loss of the use of one or more limbs or total blindness; or(ii) has been certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as fifty per centum disabled.(5) Sign a statement that the veteran will not be involved in fraudulent activities as defined by the commission. A violation of the statement by the veteran may result in the loss of electronic transponder privileges.(b) The commission shall, not later than thirty days after the effective date of this section, publish an application form and guidance necessary to implement this section. The commission shall approve or deny a completed application under this section not later than forty-five days after receipt of the application.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1840PN2276 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425